Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.130

Hearing—Appointment of appraiser.

At the hearing, the judge may, upon the proof of the service of a copy of the petition and notice and of the facts stated in the petition, appoint a disinterested qualified person of the county to appraise the value of the homestead.

[ 1987 c 442 s 213; 1984 c 118 s 1; 1895 c 64 s 13; RRS s 541. Formerly RCW 6.12.180.]

NOTES:

Compensation of appraiser: RCW 6.13.190.